California statutes. Fish and Game Code
 strategy’s conservation goals and objectives can feasibly be measured with existing technology. The net ecological gain from the implementation of conservation actions and habitat enhancement actions that include habitat restoration shall be reported using consistent metrics that measure the increment of gain in the area and quality of habitat or other natural resource values compared to baseline conditions described in the regional conservation investment strategy, and measures the increment of gain in relation to the regional conservation investment strategy’s conservation objectives.

(11) Describes the proposed landownership of the site or sites of the conservation actions or habitat enhancement actions.

(12) Includes a template conservation easement, or other instrument
 providing for perpetual protection of land in a manner consistent with approved natural community conservation plans within the area of the applicable regional conservation investment strategy, for the sites of any conservation action and an explanation of how the long-term durability of the sites of any habitat
 enhancement actions will be ensured.

(13) Ensures that the implementation of the conservation actions or habitat enhancement actions will be adequately funded and that long-term protection and management of the sites will be funded in accordance with Chapter 4.6 (commencing with Section 65965) of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code or, if a state agency proposed to enter into a mitigation credit agreement, another comparable funding mechanism approved by the department in accordance with an adopted statewide policy regarding funding for long-term management and operations of mitigation sites.

(14) Includes a template monitoring and long-term adaptive management plan.

(15) Explains the
 terms and conditions under which the proposed mitigation credits may be sold or otherwise transferred and how the proposed mitigation credits will be accounted for, including the specific methods proposed for reporting and maintaining a record of credit creation, release, and use, sale, or transfer.

(16) Includes enforcement provisions.

(17) Ensures that, for each site on which the conservation actions or habitat enhancement actions will be implemented, information consistent with, pursuant to this chapter, the information required for a mitigation bank in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 1798 and subparagraphs (B) to (H), inclusive, of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 1798.5 shall be prepared and submitted to the department for review for adequacy and
 approval prior to implementation.

(18) Includes a proposed credit ledger and credit release schedule that meets the requirements of subdivision (h).

(h) (1) The release of mitigation credits for use, sale, or transfer under a mitigation credit agreement shall require the department’s approval in accordance with this subdivision. Once the department
 has approved the release of a mitigation credit, it may be used, sold, or transferred in accordance with the mitigation credit agreement regardless of the duration or expiration of the regional conservation investment strategy or strategies on which the mitigation credit agreement relied.

(2) The release of mitigation credits shall be tied to performance-based milestones and achievement of ecological performance standards. The credit release schedule for each mitigation credit agreement shall reserve a substantial share of the total credits for release after those ecological performance standards are fully achieved. Performance-based milestones shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(A) Permanently protecting the site of a conservation action, or
 putting into place measures that ensure the long-term durability of a habitat enhancement action in accordance with subdivision (e).

(B) Completing construction of any proposed habitat restoration actions.

(C) Achieving temporal ecological performance standards for any proposed habitat restoration actions, such as standards established for one year, three years, or five years following the initiation of habitat restoration.

(D) Fully achieving ecological performance standards.

(3) The terms of the credit release schedule shall be specified in the mitigation credit agreement. When conservation actions and habitat enhancement actions are
 implemented and meet the performance-based milestones specified in the credit release schedule, credits shall be created in accordance with the credit release schedule. If a conservation action or habitat enhancement action does not meet performance-based milestones, the department may suspend the release of credits, reduce the number of credits, or otherwise modify the credit release schedule accordingly.

(4) In order for mitigation credits to be released, the person or entity that has entered into a mitigation credit agreement shall demonstrate to the department that the appropriate performance-based milestones for credit release have been met. The department shall determine whether the milestones have been met and the credits may be released.

(i) (1) Mitigation credit agreements may be used to establish the terms and conditions under which mitigation credits can be created by projects that improve wildlife habitat, or that address stressors to wildlife, to an extent that quantifiably exceeds compensatory mitigation requirements established by the department for those projects pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) or Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3. Those projects may include, but are not limited to, the construction of setback levees that result in the creation of more floodplain or riparian habitat than is required to compensate for construction impacts or the construction of transportation facility improvements that remove barriers to fish or wildlife movement and thereby improve the quality of habitat or address stressors to wildlife to a greater extent than is required to compensate
 for construction impacts. For those projects, the project proponent may submit a draft mitigation credit agreement that proposes the terms and conditions under which mitigation credits may be created and used by or in conjunction with those projects to the department for its review, revision, and approval. The submission may occur concurrently with, or after, an application submitted pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 or a notice submitted pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 1600) or may occur after the application or notice is submitted. Where a draft mitigation agreement is submitted concurrently with the application or notice, the department shall review the draft mitigation credit agreement concurrently with its review of the application or notice and shall, to the maximum extent practicable, complete its review of both the notice or application and
 the draft agreement concurrently.

(2) Mitigation credit agreements submitted to the department pursuant to this subdivision may comply with the requirements of subdivision (h) with a credit release schedule related to construction of the project that will improve wildlife habitat, or will address stressors to wildlife, to an extent that exceeds compensatory mitigation requirements quantifiably. For those projects, construction of the project may be a performance-based milestone required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (h).

(j) Nothing in this chapter is intended to limit or impose additional conditions on the creation or sale of mitigation credits by a conservation bank or mitigation bank approved by the department pursuant to Chapter 7.9 (commencing with Section 1797).

(k) The creation of mitigation credits pursuant to this section from a conservation action or habitat enhancement action implemented within the plan area of an approved natural community conservation plan shall require the advance written approval of the plan’s implementing entity. This advance written approval may be provided in a letter from the implementing entity to the person or entity seeking a mitigation credit agreement with the department, or in any other form approved by the department.

(l) The department shall make project mitigation credit and release information, including the demonstration submitted pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (h), publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 463, Sec. 5.   (AB 2805)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1857.

(a) The Fish and Wildlife Regional Conservation Investment Strategy Program Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury.

(b) The department shall collect fees or other compensation from a person or entity that proposes to enter into a mitigation credit agreement, and from a public agency or federally recognized tribe that proposes a regional conservation investment strategy or a regional conservation assessment, to pay for all or a portion of the department’s costs relating to the mitigation credit agreement, proposed strategy, or proposed assessment. Fees received pursuant to this subdivision shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Regional Conservation Investment
 Strategy Program Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 463, Sec. 6.   (AB 2805)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1858.

(a) The department may adopt guidelines and criteria to aid in the implementation of this chapter. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of guidelines or criteria pursuant to this section. The department may post a draft of any proposed guidelines or guidelines amendment on its internet website for public review and comment. Adopted guidelines and criteria shall be posted on the department’s internet website.

(b) (1) The department shall provide an opportunity for review and comment on the draft guidelines or guidelines amendment for a
 reasonable period based on the complexity of the draft guidelines or guidelines amendment, but not less than 30 days. Review and comment shall not be
 required for annual updates to the fee schedule.

(2) The department shall give notice of the availability of the draft guidelines or guidelines amendment for review and comment to each of the following:

(A) A public agency or federally recognized tribe that has published notice of its intent to create a regional conservation investment strategy.

(B) A person or entity that has submitted a mitigation credit agreement.

(C) A public agency, organization, or individual who has filed a written request to the department for notices regarding draft
 guidelines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 463, Sec. 7.   (AB 2805)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1860.

Nothing in this chapter supersedes, limits, or otherwise modifies the Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Reform Act of 2009 (Division 35 (commencing with Section 85000) of the Water Code) or Division 22.3 (commencing with Section 32300) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (AB 2087)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Native Plant Protection [1900. - 1913.]

1900.

The intent of the Legislature and the purpose of this chapter is to preserve, protect and enhance endangered or rare native plants of this state.

The Legislature finds that many species and subspecies of native plants are endangered because their habitats are threatened with destruction, drastic modification, or severe curtailment, or because of commercial exploitation or by other means, or because of disease or other factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

The department shall establish criteria for determining if a species, subspecies, or variety of native plant is endangered or rare. As used in this chapter, “native plant” means a plant growing in a wild uncultivated state which is normally found native to the plantlife of this state. A species, subspecies, or variety is endangered when its prospects of survival and reproduction are in immediate jeopardy from one or more causes. A species, subspecies, or variety is rare when, although not presently threatened with extinction, it is in such small numbers throughout its range that it may become endangered if its present environment worsens.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

The commission may, after public hearing, designate endangered and rare native plants. To the extent that the location of such plants is known, the department shall notify the owners of such land of the fact that a rare or endangered native plant is growing thereon and provide such information about the protection of such plants as may be appropriate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

The department may undertake botanical research and field investigations and may collect and diffuse such statistics and information as shall pertain to the conservation, protection, and perpetuation of native plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1906.

Nothing in this code or any other law shall prohibit the department from taking, for scientific or propagation purposes, any species of native plants. The department may import, propagate, and distribute native plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1907.

(a) The commission may adopt regulations governing the taking, possession, propagation, transportation, exportation, importation, or sale of any endangered or rare native plants. Such regulations may include, but shall not be limited to, requirements for persons who perform any of the foregoing activities to maintain written records and to obtain permits which may be issued by the department.

(b) Persons engaged in the production, storage, sale, delivery, or transportation of nursery stock pursuant to the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 6701) of Division 4 of the Food and
 Agricultural Code shall not be required to obtain a permit pursuant to this chapter unless such activities involve the collection of rare or endangered plants or parts or products thereof growing in a wild, uncultivated state.

(c) Persons who purchase nursery grown stock shall not be required to obtain a permit pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1908.

No person shall import into this state, or take, possess, or sell within this state, except as incident to the possession or sale of the real property on which the plant is growing, any native plant, or any part or product thereof, that the commission determines to be an endangered native plant or rare native plant, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1909.

(a) When any power or authority is given by any provision of this chapter to any person, it may be exercised by any deputy, inspector, or agent duly authorized by that person.

(b) Any person in whom the enforcement of any provision of this chapter is vested has the power of a peace officer as to the enforcement of that provision. This subdivision applies to any state or federal agencies, the State of Nevada, the State of Oregon, or the State of Arizona, with which cooperative agreements have been made by the department to enforce any provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 27.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

1910.

A peace officer or an employee or agent of the department may, in the enforcement of this chapter, make arrests without warrant for a violation of this chapter he may witness, and may confiscate plants or parts thereof when unlawfully taken, transported, possessed, sold, or otherwise, in violation of this chapter. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to the provisions of Section 384a of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1911.

All state departments and agencies shall, in consultation with the department, utilize their authority in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter by carrying out programs for the conservation of endangered or rare native plants. Such programs include, but are not limited to, the identification, delineation and protection of habitat critical to the continued survival of endangered or rare native plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1912.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable to emergency work necessary to protect life or property; however, notification by the person or agency performing such emergency work shall be made to the department within 14 days of the commencement of such work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

1913.

(a) The provisions of this chapter are not intended and shall not be construed as authorizing any public agency to mandate, prescribe, or otherwise regulate agricultural operations or management practices, including the clearing of land for agricultural practices or fire control measures.

(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 1911, timber operations in accordance with a timber harvesting plan submitted pursuant to the provisions of the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code), or required mining assessment work pursuant to federal or state mining laws, or the removal of endangered or rare native plants from a canal,
 lateral ditch, building site, or road, or other right-of-way by the owner of the land or the owner’s agent, or the performance by a public agency or a publicly or privately owned public utility of its obligation to provide service to the public, shall not be restricted by this chapter because of the presence of rare or endangered plants, except as provided in subdivision (c) of this section.

(c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section, where the owner of land has been notified by the department pursuant to Section 1904 that a rare or endangered native plant is growing on that land, the owner shall notify the department at least 10 days in advance of changing the land use to allow for salvage of that plant. The failure by the department to salvage that plant within 10 days of notification shall entitle the owner of the land to proceed without regard to this chapter. Submission of a timber harvesting plan
 pursuant to the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code) shall constitute notice under this section. Converting from one type of agricultural use, as defined in Section 51201 of the Government Code, to another type of agricultural use shall not constitute a change in land use.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 28.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11. California Desert Native Plants [1925. - 1926.]

1925.

The department shall enforce the provisions of the California Desert Native Plants Act Division 23 (commencing with Section 80001) of the Food and Agricultural Code except that permits, tags, seals, and wood receipts shall be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 80101) of Division 23 of the Food and Agricultural Code, by the county agricultural commissioner or the sheriff. Nothing in the California Desert Native Plants Act, or any other law, prohibits the department from taking, for scientific or propagation purposes, any species of native plants. The department may import, propagate, and distribute native plants, and the California Desert Native Plants Act does not apply to those activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 34.)
-------------------------------------------

1926.

In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the department shall cooperate fully with the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 443.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 11.5. Western Joshua Tree Conservation Act [1927. - 1927.12.]

1927.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited as, the Western Joshua Tree Conservation Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Accessory structure” means a subordinate structure, the use of which is incidental to an existing or contemporaneously constructed single-family residence, including, an accessory dwelling unit, addition to an existing single-family residence, garage, carport, swimming pool, patio, greenhouse, storage shed, gazebo, septic tank, sewer connection, solar panels, fence, or gravel or paved driveway.

(b) “California Endangered Species Act” means the act established pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3.

(c) “Conserve” or “conservation” means to
 use, and the use of, methods and procedures that are necessary to bring species listed pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 to the point at which the measures provided pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 are no longer necessary, and for species that are not listed to maintain or enhance the condition of the species so that listing will not become necessary.

(d) “Dead western Joshua tree” means a western Joshua tree that meets at least one of the following criteria:

(1) Has not burned and has no green leaves, no new growth on the main stem, and no basal sprouts.

(2) Has partially or fully burned at least 18 months prior and otherwise satisfies paragraph (1).

(3) Has fallen and is completely
 detached from its roots or has fallen and its roots are no longer in contact with the soil.

(e) “Desert native plant specialist” means an arborist certified by the International Society of Arborists, or an individual with at least five years of professional experience with relocation or restoration of native California desert vegetation.

(f) “Fee” means the elective fee described in subdivisions (d) and (e) of Section 1927.3, which is to be deposited into the fund.

(g) “Fund” means the Western Joshua Tree Conservation Fund as described in Section 1927.5.

(h) “Multifamily residence” means an apartment building, rowhouse, town house, condominium, or manufactured building that consists of two or more attached dwelling units designed for occupancy by two or
 more families living independently of one another.

(i) “Public works project” means a project involving the erection, construction, alteration, repair, or improvement of any public structure, building, road, or other public improvement of any kind.

(j) “Relocated” or “relocation” means the removal of a living western Joshua tree and a sufficient portion of its root mass from the ground and transplanting it.

(k) “Single-family residence” means a single detached building that has been, or will be, constructed and used as living facilities, including provisions for sleeping, eating, cooking, and sanitation, as required by the California Building Standards Code, for not more than one household.

(l) “Western Joshua tree” means Yucca brevifolia, an
 evergreen, tree-like plant that has been treated as a member of the asparagus family (Asparagaceae).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Conditionally operative pursuant to Section 1927.2.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.2.

(a) No person or public agency shall import into this state, export out of this state, or take, possess, purchase, or sell within this state, a western Joshua tree or any part or product of the tree, except as authorized pursuant to any of the following, as applicable:

(1) This chapter.

(2) The California Endangered Species Act.

(3) The Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3).

(b) During any period in which the western Joshua tree has been designated by the commission as a candidate for
 listing under the California Endangered Species Act, any person or public agency seeking a take authorization for the western Joshua tree may obtain a take authorization as provided by the California Endangered Species Act or by electing to pay the fees set forth in Section 1927.3.

(c) (1) This chapter is a change in state law, within the meaning of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 2075.5, that has a direct and significant impact on the commission’s determination as to whether the petitioned action is warranted. Pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2075.5, the commission shall reopen the administrative record for the commission’s determination for the purpose of assessing the impact of the conservation program established by this chapter.

(2) In making the assessment described in paragraph (1), the commission shall consider all of the
 following:

(A) The effectiveness of any conservation measures funded through expenditures of fees by the department pursuant to Section 1927.5.

(B) The conservation plan developed by the department and approved by the commission pursuant to Section 1927.6.

(C) Any annual reports submitted to the commission by the department pursuant to Section 1927.7.

(D) Any recommendations submitted to the commission by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1927.8.

(E) The fee adjustments, if any, adopted by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1927.8.

(F) An updated status review to be submitted to the
 commission by the department no later than January 1, 2033, unless the commission directs the department to submit the updated status review sooner.

(d) If the commission determines that listing the western Joshua tree as endangered or threatened pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act is not warranted, this chapter shall remain operative and the authorization of take of a western Joshua tree shall be pursuant to this chapter.

(e) If the commission determines that listing the western Joshua tree as endangered or threatened pursuant to the California Endangered Species Act is warranted, this chapter shall become inoperative and the authorization of take of a western Joshua tree shall only be pursuant to Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 2050) of Division 3 or pursuant to the Natural Community Conservation Planning Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of
 Division 3).

(f) Upon the approval of a natural community conservation plan that provides for the conservation of the western Joshua tree as a covered species, the authorization of take of a western Joshua tree for any project or activity covered by the plan shall only be pursuant to Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2800) of Division 3.

(g) The provisions of the Native Plant Protection Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 1900)), and the California Desert Native Plants Act (Division 23 (commencing with Section 80001) of the Food and Agricultural Code), shall not apply to the western Joshua tree.

(h) This section shall not preclude the department from authorizing, by permit or memorandum of understanding, the taking, possession, purchase, or sale within the state of a western Joshua tree to aid the conservation
 and recovery of the western Joshua tree, or entering into memoranda of understanding with California Native American tribes to provide for the taking and possession of western Joshua trees for tribal cultural purposes, or as otherwise required by applicable law.

(i) Any authorization issued by the department pursuant to Section 2081 or 2084, before the enactment of this chapter, to import, export, take, possess, purchase, or sell a western Joshua tree shall be valid and remain in effect after the enactment of this chapter pursuant to the terms of the authorization.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 51, Sec. 5.   (SB 122)   Effective July 10, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1927.3.

(a) The department may authorize, by permit, the taking of a western Joshua tree if all of the following conditions are met:

(1) The permittee submits to the department for its approval a census of all western Joshua trees on the project site, including size information and photographs, that categorize the western Joshua trees according to the following size classes:

(A) Less than one meter in height.

(B) One meter or greater but less than five meters in height.

(C) Five meters or greater in height.

(2) The permittee avoids and minimizes impacts to, and the taking of, the western Joshua tree to the maximum extent practicable. Minimization may include trimming, encroachment on root systems, relocation, or other actions that result in detrimental but nonlethal impacts to a western Joshua tree.

(3) The permittee mitigates all impacts to, and taking of, the western Joshua tree. The measures required to meet this obligation shall be roughly proportional in extent to the impact of the authorized taking of the species. When various measures are available to meet this obligation, the measures required shall maintain the permittee’s objectives to the greatest extent possible. All required measures shall be capable of successful implementation. The permittee shall ensure adequate
 funding to implement the mitigation measures. In lieu of completing the mitigation obligation on its own, the permittee may elect to satisfy this mitigation obligation by paying fees, pursuant to the fee schedule in subdivision (d), (e), or (g), for deposit into the fund.

(4) (A) The department may include permit conditions that require the permittee to relocate one or more of the western Joshua trees. If relocation is required, the permittee shall implement measures to assist the survival of relocated trees, and to comply with any other reasonable measures required by the department to facilitate the successful relocation and survival of the western Joshua trees. These relocation measures shall include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(i) A
 requirement that the relocated western Joshua tree is placed in a location and with proper orientation to improve its survival.

(ii) A requirement that western Joshua trees are relocated at a time that maximizes their survival when feasible.

(iii) A requirement that a desert native plant specialist be onsite to oversee relocation.

(B) The department may limit relocation to certain size classes of trees.

(C) By July 1, 2024, the department shall adopt guidelines and relocation protocols, based on the best available science, to relocate western Joshua trees successfully. The department shall consult with desert native plant specialists as part of the development of these
 guidelines and relocation protocols. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of guidelines and relocation protocols pursuant to this subparagraph.

(b) For purposes of this section, each western Joshua tree stem or trunk arising from the ground shall be considered an individual tree requiring mitigation, regardless of its proximity to any other western Joshua tree stem or trunk.

(c) (1) If all of the conditions of paragraph (3) are met, the department may enter into an agreement with any county to delegate to the county the ability to authorize the taking of a western Joshua tree associated with developing any one or more of the
 following projects concurrent with the county’s approval of the project:

(A) Single-family residences.

(B) Multifamily residences.

(C) Accessory structures.

(D) Public works projects.

(2) If all of the conditions of paragraph (3) are met, the department may enter into an agreement with any city to delegate to the city the ability to authorize the taking of a western Joshua tree associated with developing any one or more of the following projects concurrent with the city’s approval of the project:

(A) Single-family residences.

(B) Multifamily residences.

(C) Accessory structures.

(D) Public works projects.

(E) Commercial projects.

(F) Industrial projects.

(3) The delegation of authority pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be subject to all of the following conditions:

(A) The county or city adopts an ordinance that requires as a condition of any approval or permit issued under the authority of an agreement entered into pursuant to this subdivision satisfaction of the requirements of this
 chapter.

(B) Except as provided otherwise in this subdivision, the county or city ensures that the permittee satisfies all of the requirements of subdivision (a) of this section.

(C) The project will take no more than 10 individual western Joshua trees on the project site where the project proponent proposes to construct a single-family residence, multifamily residence, or accessory structure, or no more than 40 individual western Joshua trees on the project site on which a project proponent proposes to construct a commercial or industrial project or a public agency proposes to undertake a public works project. Before authorizing the take of more than 20, but no more than 40, individual western Joshua trees for a commercial or industrial project or a public works project, the
 county or city shall obtain the department’s written concurrence that the project has avoided and minimized the take of western Joshua trees to the maximum extent practicable.

(D) The county or city shall collect any fees for permits issued and remit them quarterly to the fund as directed by the department.

(E) The county or city entering into an agreement pursuant to this subdivision may impose a reasonable fee to cover the administrative costs of issuing the permit.

(F) (i) The department retains express authority to suspend or revoke the county or city’s take authorization in the event the department determines the county or city has violated the terms of the agreement, or this chapter, the county or
 city fails to implement or enforce the terms of the agreement or this chapter, or the department determines that the local population of western Joshua trees within, or in the vicinity of, that county or city needs further protection. The county or city shall conduct an annual assessment of the status of the local population within the county or city and submit the assessment to the department. The department shall determine if the population needs further protection to provide for the conservation of the species.

(ii) The department shall adopt standardized survey and assessment methods for the annual assessment required pursuant to clause (i), including requiring that a desert native plant specialist conduct the assessment. Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall
 not apply to the development, adoption, or amendment of standardized survey and assessment methods pursuant to this subparagraph.

(G) The county or city shall be required to submit to the department quarterly reports documenting the number of permits issued, photographs and other evidence demonstrating that take and other impacts were avoided and minimized to the maximum extent practicable, the number and size class of western Joshua
 trees authorized to be taken, the number of western Joshua trees encroached upon, the number of western Joshua trees lethally removed, the number and location of western Joshua trees relocated, the amount of fees collected, and other information required by the department in the agreement.

(d) Any person or public agency receiving a take authorization pursuant to this chapter for a project that meets the criteria of either subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) may elect, in lieu of satisfying the mitigation obligation provided for in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), to pay fees in the amounts provided in paragraph (2) for deposit into the fund.

(1) (A) Any project in the area bounded by the intersection of Highway 99 and Highway 58, then
 east along Highway 58 to the intersection of Interstate 15, then north along Interstate 15 to the intersection of Highway 247, then south along Highway 247 to the intersection of Highway 18, then west along Highway 18 to the intersection of Highway 138, then west and north along Highway 138 to the intersection of Interstate 5, then north along Interstate 5 to the intersection of Highway 99, then north along Highway 99 to Highway 58.

(B) Any single-family residence, multifamily residence, accessory structure, or public works project receiving a permit issued by a county or city pursuant to an agreement with the department pursuant to subdivision (c), regardless of location.

(2) (A) One thousand dollars ($1,000) for each western Joshua tree five meters or greater in height.

(B) Two hundred dollars ($200) for each western Joshua tree one meter or greater but less than five meters in height.

(C) One hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each western Joshua tree less than one meter in height.

(e) Any person or public agency receiving a take authorization pursuant to this chapter for a project that meets the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) may elect, in lieu of satisfying the mitigation obligation provided for in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), to pay fees in the amounts provided in paragraph (2) for deposit into the fund.

(1) (A) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (d), any project within two miles of Joshua Tree National Park, or any unit of the state park system.

(B) Any project that does not meet the criteria set forth in paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(2) (A) Two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each western Joshua tree five meters or greater in height.

(B) Five hundred dollars ($500) for each western Joshua tree one meter or greater but less than five meters in height.

(C) Three hundred forty dollars ($340) for each western Joshua tree less than one meter in height.

(f) Upon request, the department may authorize a reduction in the amount of the fees prescribed by subdivisions (d) and (e) for any western Joshua tree conserved by a project proponent through the acquisition of compensatory habitat mitigation land otherwise required by law for the project.

(g) Notwithstanding subdivisions (d) and (e), a person or public agency receiving a take authorization from the department pursuant to this chapter for a project that meets the criteria set forth in either subparagraph (A) or (B) of paragraph (1) may elect to, in lieu of satisfying the mitigation obligation provided for in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a), pay fees in the amounts provided in paragraph (2) for deposit into the fund.

(1) (A) The removal of no more than
 10 western Joshua trees or trimming of western Joshua trees by an owner-occupant of an existing single-family residence if the western Joshua trees are either of the following:

(i) Within 30 feet of the existing single-family residence or within 15 feet of an existing accessory structure.
